Washington statutes.
RCW 15.30.010

Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter:

(1) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state of Washington.

(2) "Director" means the director of the department or his or her duly appointed representative.

(3) "Person" means a natural person, individual, or firm, partnership, corporation, company, society, and association and every officer, agent, or employee thereof. This term shall import either the singular or plural, as the case may be.

(4) "Controlled atmosphere storage" means any storage warehouse consisting of one or more rooms, or one or more rooms in any one facility in which atmospheric gases are controlled in their amount and in degrees of temperature for the purpose of controlling the condition and maturity of any fresh fruits or vegetables in order that, upon removal, they may be designated as having been exposed to controlled atmosphere.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6047; 1961 c 29 s 1.]